Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.121

Perpetual advanced six-year plans for coordinated transportation program, expenditures—Nonmotorized transportation—Railroad right-of-way.

(1) At any time before adoption of the budget, the legislative authority of each county, after one or more public hearings thereon, shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive transportation program for the ensuing six calendar years. If the county has adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to chapter 35.63 or 36.70 RCW, the inherent authority of a charter county derived from its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW, the program shall be consistent with this comprehensive plan.

The program shall include proposed road and bridge construction work and other transportation facilities and programs deemed appropriate, and for those counties operating ferries shall also include a separate section showing proposed capital expenditures for ferries, docks, and related facilities. The program shall include any new or enhanced bicycle or pedestrian facilities identified pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(6) or other applicable changes that promote nonmotorized transit. Copies of the program shall be filed with the county road administration board and with the state secretary of transportation not more than thirty days after its adoption by the legislative authority. The purpose of this section is to assure that each county shall perpetually have available advanced plans looking to the future for not less than six years as a guide in carrying out a coordinated transportation program. The program may at any time be revised by a majority of the legislative authority but only after a public hearing thereon.

(2) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain information as to how a county will expend its moneys, including funds made available pursuant to chapter 47.30 RCW, for nonmotorized transportation purposes.

(3) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain information as to how a county shall act to preserve railroad right-of-way in the event the railroad ceases to operate in the county's jurisdiction.

(4) The six-year plan for each county shall specifically set forth those projects and programs of regional significance for inclusion in the transportation improvement program within that region.

[ 2005 c 360 s 3; 1997 c 188 s 1. Prior: 1994 c 179 s 2; 1994 c 158 s 8; 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 58; 1988 c 167 s 8; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 20; prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 215 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 21 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 26; 1963 c 4 s 36.81.121; prior: 1961 c 195 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2005 c 360: See note following RCW 36.70A.070.

Captions not law—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 158: See RCW 47.80.902 through 47.80.904.

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.

Savings—Severability—1988 c 167: See notes following RCW 47.26.121.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 49: See RCW 36.79.901.

Effective dates—1967 ex.s. c 83: See RCW 47.26.910.

Highways, roads, streets in urban areas, urban arterials, development: Chapter 47.26 RCW.

Long range arterial construction planning, counties and cities to prepare data: RCW 47.26.170.